Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ST. PAUL; MINNESOTA LATINO MUSEUM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $10,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of St. Paul to the Minnesota Latino Museum to acquire property for, and to design, construct, furnish, and equip, the Minnesota Latino Museum at 85 West Water Street on Harriet Island. The city may enter into a lease or management agreement for operation of the museum, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.695. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $10,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end